Washington statutes.
RCW 41.20.030

Meetings—Disbursements of fund—Quorum.

The board herein provided for shall hold monthly meetings on the first Mondays of each month and upon the call of its president. It shall issue warrants, signed by its president and secretary, to the persons entitled thereto under provisions of this chapter other than RCW 41.20.050, 41.20.060, 41.20.080 and 41.20.085 for the amounts of money ordered paid to such persons from such fund by said board, which warrants shall state for what purpose such payments are made; it shall keep a record of its proceedings, which record shall be a public record; it shall, at each monthly meeting, send to the treasurer of such city a written or printed list of all persons entitled to payment under provisions of this chapter other than RCW 41.20.050, 41.20.060, 41.20.080 and 41.20.085 from the fund herein provided for, stating the amount of such payments and for what granted, which list shall be certified to and signed by the president and secretary of such board, attested under oath. The treasurer of such city shall thereupon enter a copy of said list upon a book to be kept for that purpose and which shall be known as "the police relief and pension fund book", and the said board shall direct payment of the amounts named therein to the persons entitled thereto, out of such fund. The treasurer shall prepare and enter into such book an additional list showing those persons entitled to payment under RCW 41.20.050, 41.20.060, 41.20.080 and 41.20.085 and shall on the last day of each month issue warrants in the appropriate amounts to such persons. A majority of all the members of said board herein provided for shall constitute a quorum, and have power to transact business.

[ 1973 c 143 s 1; 1911 c 18 s 5; 1909 c 39 s 11; RRS s 9589.]